Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 4. Settlement of Lands

§ 36-7-401.
Notice lands open for settlement.

Upon receipt of notice by the contracting company that water for beneficial irrigation can be furnished for all or any part of the lands in any segregation list at stated time, it being shown to the satisfaction of the board that the contracting company will be able to deliver water at the said time, it shall be the duty of the board, by publication, at the expense of the contracting company, in one (1) newspaper in the county in which said lands are situated and such other newspaper or newspapers as may be designated by the contracting company, to give notice that certain lands, generally described, are open for settlement; that the land will be sold at fifty cents ($.50) per acre by the state and that proportionate interests in the irrigation system for a perpetual water supply can be purchased at the price named and water for beneficial irrigation can be furnished on the date named, and such other information as the board shall deem advisable.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 17; R.S. 1899, § 950; C.S. 1910, § 676; Laws 1911, ch. 94, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 787; R.S. 1931, § 91-719; C.S. 1945, § 24-417; W.S. 1957, § 36-107.

§ 36-7-402.
Proceeds earmarked for reclamation.

Pursuant to the act of congress, approved August 18, 1894 (28 Stat., 372-422) [43 U.S.C. § 641], all moneys received by the state of Wyoming from the payments of fifty cents ($.50) an acre received on lands segregated under what is commonly known as the Carey Act [43 U.S.C. § 641], and all moneys received as fees pursuant to operations of the Carey Act, are hereby appropriated for the purpose of reclaiming school or granted lands belonging to the state of Wyoming, and lands which may be hereafter granted or selected for the said state of Wyoming for any purpose whatsoever.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 63, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 694; C.S. 1920, § 807; R.S. 1931, § 91-739; C.S. 1945, § 24-437; W.S. 1957, § 36-108.

Carey Act. —

See note following chapter heading.

§ 36-7-403.
Application for entry; certificate of location; payments.

Any adult citizen of the United States or any adult person having declared his intention of becoming a citizen of the United States, may make application, under oath, to the board, to enter any of said land in an amount not to exceed one hundred and sixty (160) acres for any one (1) person; and such application shall set forth that the person desiring to make such entry does so for the purpose of actual reclamation, cultivation and settlement in accordance with the act of congress and the laws of this state relating thereto, and that the applicant has never received the benefit of the provisions of this act to an amount greater than one hundred and sixty (160) acres, including the number of acres specified in the application under consideration. Such application must be accompanied by an original signed copy or a certified copy of a contract for a water right, made and entered into by the party making the application with the person, company or association who have been authorized by the board to furnish water for the reclamation of said lands, or, if the person, company or association who has been authorized by the board to furnish water for the reclamation of said lands is not the owner of the water right attached and appurtenant to the land upon which the applicant seeks to file, then, with the bona fide owner of said water right; such application for entry shall be made within thirty (30) days from the time the applicant shall have contracted with the owners of the water right attached and appurtenant to the land for the purchase of a proportionate interest in said water right, and it shall be the duty of the owners of the water rights to notify the director whenever they have contracted with applicants for the purchase of proportionate interests in said water rights; and if said applicant has at any previous time entered lands under the provisions of this article, he shall so state in his application, together with description, date of entry and location of said land. The board shall thereupon file in its office the application and papers relating thereto, and, if allowed, issue a certificate of location to the applicant. All applications for entry shall be accompanied by a payment of twenty-five cents ($.25) per acre, which shall be paid as a partial payment on the land if the application is allowed; and all certificates when issued shall be recorded in a book to be kept for that purpose. If the application is not allowed, the twenty-five cents ($.25) per acre accompanying it shall be returned to the applicant; provided, that where the construction company fails to furnish water to any settler under the provisions of its contract with the state, the state shall refund to such settler, all payments that he shall have made to the state. The board shall dispose of all lands accepted by the state under the provisions of this article at a uniform price of fifty cents ($.50) per acre, half to be paid at the time of entry and the remainder at the time of making final proof by the settler; and, provided, further, that whenever any citizen of the United States, or any person having declared his intention of becoming a citizen of the United States, shall make application as provided in this section to enter any of said land in an amount not exceeding one hundred and sixty (160) acres, and shall further prove to the satisfaction of the board that he or she is the father or mother of eight (8) living children, it shall be the duty of the board to permit the application for entry by him or her without charge and to issue a certificate of location to such applicant without charge, and to dispose of such lands to said applicant upon final proof being made.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 18; R.S. 1899, § 951; Laws 1909, ch. 35, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 677; C.S. 1920, § 788; R.S. 1931, § 91-720; Laws 1937, ch. 41, § 1; 1943, ch. 54, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 24-418; W.S. 1957, § 36-109; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1992, ch. 55, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to water rights, see chapter 3 of title 41.

Meaning of “act of congress.” —

The “act of congress,” referred to in the first sentence, apparently means the federal Carey Act, which appears as 43 U.S.C. § 641.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note following §

36-7-103

.

Right to use water for irrigation of arid lands is property right

acquired by appropriation; that is, by diversion and application of water to beneficial uses. North Side Canal Co. v. State Board of Equalization, 17 F.2d 55, 1926 U.S. App. LEXIS 2732 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1926), cert. denied, 274 U.S. 740, 47 S. Ct. 586, 71 L. Ed. 1320, 1927 U.S. LEXIS 158 (U.S. 1927).

Rights of appropriators limited. —

Common carrier of water is the agent or trustee of the actual appropriators who put water to beneficial use, and the rights of the latter are limited by contract with carrier as well as by provisions of law. State v. Laramie Rivers Co., 59 Wyo. 9, 136 P.2d 487,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1943).

Invalid contract. —

Contract by which company which obtained license from board of land commissioners to construct irrigation works gave to third party exclusive right to contract with settlers for perpetual water rights within a fixed cost range was contrary to law and against public policy. McKinney v. Big Horn Basin Development Co., 167 F. 770, 1909 U.S. App. LEXIS 4379 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1909).

Applied

in

Walliker v. Escott, 608 P.2d 1272,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 250

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

Ver Straten v. Board of Comm'rs, 35 Wyo. 67, 246 P. 916,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1926).

§ 36-7-404.
Final proof of reclamation; fee and last payment; right to patent; failure to timely prove.

Within three (3) years from the date of the certificate of location issued to an entryman on the Carey Act lands, the entryman shall appear before the director, who is hereby authorized to administer oaths in matters pertaining to the state of Carey Act lands in Wyoming, a judge or clerk of the district or circuit court of any state, or commissioner of the United States district court, and make final proof of reclamation, settlement, and occupation, which proof shall embrace evidence that he has a perpetual water right for the irrigable area of the tract of land so filed upon, sufficient in volume for the complete irrigation and reclamation thereof, and has cultivated and irrigated not less than one-fourth part of the irrigable area of said tract and not less than one-eighth of the entire tract filed upon, that he has resided upon the land for the period of time required by the rules of the board, and such further proof, if any, as may be required by the regulations of the department of the interior, or the board. The officer taking this proof shall be entitled to a fee of two dollars ($2.00), which fee shall be paid by the entryman, and shall be in addition to the price paid to the state for the land. All proofs so received shall be submitted by the director to the board, and shall be accompanied by the last and final payment for said land, and on the approval of the same by the said board, shall entitle the said entryman to a patent to said land, whenever said land shall be patented by the United States to the state; provided, that when the director shall take such final proofs, all fees received by him shall be turned in to the state treasury; provided further, that when an entryman fails to make final proof within three (3) years from the date of the issuance of the certificate of location, the board may in its discretion, after (60) days’ notice is given to the entryman by registered letter to his last known address, cancel the certificate of location and declare the land covered by such certificate open to entry.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 20; R.S. 1899, § 953; Laws 1903, ch. 8, § 1; 1909, ch. 160, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 678; Laws 1913, ch. 54, § 1; 1915, ch. 83, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 789; R.S. 1931, § 91-721; Laws 1943, ch. 55, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 24-419; W.S. 1957, § 36-110; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to authority to administer oaths, see §

36-3-107

.

Carey Act. —

See note following chapter heading.

Erroneous judgment. —

Where equitable and legal title to lands was in United States, entryman having no taxable equitable interest or possessory right, judgment allowing county to retain taxes was erroneous. Ver Straten v. Board of Comm'rs, 35 Wyo. 67, 246 P. 916,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1926).

Applied

in

Walliker v. Escott, 608 P.2d 1272,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 250

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 36-7-405.
Issuance of patent to heir.

Where an entryman upon Carey Act lands, who has made valid final proof thereon, dies before the state has issued patent therefor, patent when issued, shall issue in the name of the heir of the estate of such deceased entryman.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 126, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 790; R.S. 1931, § 91-722; C.S. 1945, § 24-435; W.S. 1957, § 36-111.

Carey Act. —

See note following chapter heading.

§ 36-7-406.
Final proof by heirs; devise or descent of entry.

In all cases where lands have been entered under the provisions of W.S.

36-7-403

, and the entryman has died prior to the making of final proof of reclamation, settlement, and occupation, proof of reclamation may be made by an heir, and proof of settlement and occupation may be made by such person, or persons, or by an agent thereof, and patent when issued shall issue in the name of the heirs of the estate of such deceased entryman. Any such entry may be devised or shall descend as other real estate.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 126, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 791; R.S. 1931, § 91-723; C.S. 1945, § 24-436; W.S. 1957, § 36-112.

§ 36-7-407.
Issuance of patents.

Upon the issuance of a patent to any lands by the United States to the state, notice shall be forwarded to the settler upon such land. It shall be the duty of the board, under the signature of its president, and attested by its secretary, to issue a patent to said lands from the state to the settler.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 21; R.S. 1899, § 954; C.S. 1910, § 680; C.S. 1920, § 793; R.S. 1931, § 91-725; C.S. 1945, § 24-421; W.S. 1957, § 36-113.